src/verb.lexc
LEXICON 503
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	492;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	500;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	488;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	483;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	481;
+Opt:+yA	494;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	493;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	485;
+Prog2:+mAktA	502;
^DB+Adj+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+Agt^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	499;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	501;

LEXICON 502
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 501
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;

LEXICON 500
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 499
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	498;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr:+mHS	495;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	496;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;

LEXICON 498
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+Cond:+ysA	497;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 497
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 496
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 495
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 494
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 493
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 492
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	491;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	490;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	489;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 491
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 490
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 489
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 488
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond:+ysA	487;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	486;

LEXICON 487
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 486
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 485
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond:+ysA	484;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 484
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 483
+A3pl:+lAr	482;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 482
+Cop:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 481
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 480
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 479
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	472;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	471;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	469;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	468;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	470;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	478;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	475;
^DB+Verb+EverSince:+yAgel	477;
^DB+Verb+Repeat+Imp:+yAdur	473;

LEXICON 478
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 477
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	476;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;

LEXICON 476
+A2sg:+Hn	#;

LEXICON 475
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	474;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 474
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 473
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 472
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 471
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 470
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 469
+A2sg:+Hn	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 468
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 467
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 466
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 465
+Desr:+sA	462;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	461;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	459;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	458;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	464;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	463;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	460;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 464
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 463
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 462
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 461
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 460
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 459
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 458
+A1pl:+yHz	#;

LEXICON 457
(+z)	456;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+zlAr	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 456
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	455;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	454;

LEXICON 455
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 454
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 453
+A2sg:0		#;
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A2pl:+yHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

!degil LEXICON 452
!degil +A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 451
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	448;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	445;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	444;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	446;
+Prog2:+mAktA	450;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Verb+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	449;

LEXICON 450
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 449
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;

LEXICON 448
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	447;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 447
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 446
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 445
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 444
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 443
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	419;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	424;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	415;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	413;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	426;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	432;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	431;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	430;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	425;
^DB+Adj+FeelLike:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Verb+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo:+yAlH	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+When^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Imp:+yAbil	433;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	441;
^DB+Verb+EverSince:+yAgel	422;
^DB+Verb+Hastily+Imp+A2sg:+yHver	#;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	442;
^DB+Verb+Repeat+Imp:+yAdur	420;

LEXICON 442
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;

LEXICON 441
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	439;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	440;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	437;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	435;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	434;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	436;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 440
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 439
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	438;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 438
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 437
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 436
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;

LEXICON 435
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 434
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 433
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 432
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 431
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 430
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	428;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	427;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	429;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 429
^DB+Adverb+AsIf:+cAsHnA	#;

LEXICON 428
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 427
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 426
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 425
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
